Arkansas, session 2025, SB130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Arkansas State University for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - SYSTEM
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) President, Arkansas State University 1 $435,855
(2) Executive Vice President 1 $273,183
(3) Vice President 5 $253,319
*HAR035*
03-31-2025 17:37:57 HAR035

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB130
(4) General Counsel 1 $238,634
(5) Assoc. Vice Pres. 2 $207,598
(6) Project/Program Administrator 11
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(7) Associate General Counsel 4 $197,229
(8) Exec. Asst. to President 1 $163,598
(9) Assistant Vice President 1 $158,535
(10) Chief Audit Executive 1 $132,139
(11) Sr. Internal Auditor 3 $109,727
(12) Associate for Administration 1 $98,309
(13) Legislative Intern/Research Assist. 1 $87,721
(14) Research Assistant 2 $87,721
ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - JONESBORO
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(15) Chancellor, ASU-Jonesboro 1 $386,768
(16) Dean of Veterinary Medicine 1 $386,484
(17) Executive Vice Chancellor 2 $268,500
(18) Dean of Business Administration 1 $263,509
(19) Dean of Engineering 1 $263,509
(20) Associate Vice Provost 3 $235,373
(21) Dean of Schools 8 $222,737
(22) Vice Chancellor 4 $221,840
(23) Project/Program Administrator 119
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
03-31-2025 17:37:57 HAR035

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB130
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(24) Assoc. Dean of Schools 13 $203,817
(25) Associate Vice Chancellor 3 $194,960
(26) IT Pool 69
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
03-31-2025 17:37:57 HAR035

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB130
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(27) Executive Asst. to the Chancellor 1 $194,960
(28) Controller 1 $173,915
(29) Asst. Vice-Chancellor 7 $158,536
(30) Registrar 1 $156,464
(31) Archivist 2 $146,665
(32) Coord. of Non-Credit Activity 1 $146,665
(33) Dean Student Affairs-Enrollment Svcs. 1 $146,665
(34) Assoc. Director - Info & Tech Svcs. 2 $144,564
(35) Development/Advancement Admin. 23
Development/Advancement Director $135,747
Development/Advancement Manager $123,019
Development/Advancement Specialist $106,139
(36) Associate Controller 1 $132,372
03-31-2025 17:37:57 HAR035

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB130
(37) Dir. of Grants & Other Spons. Progs. 1 $132,372
(38) Treasurer 1 $132,372
(39) Assoc. Dean of Student Affairs 6 $131,622
(40) Associate Registrar 1 $131,622
(41) Dir. of UPD, CS, Traffic & Parking 1 $128,295
(42) Project Engineer 1 $127,980
(43) Academic/Student Support 45
Counselor $127,507
Student Development Specialist $103,502
Academic Counselor $94,342
(44) Communications Specialist 1 $121,181
(45) Research Compliance Coordinator 1 $118,104
(46) Project Architect 1 $113,381
(47) Bradbury Art Museum Director 1 $113,108
(48) Asst. Dean of Students 8 $106,608
(49) Director of Academic Advising 1 $106,608
(50) Asst. Dir. of Admissions 2 $106,311
(51) Asst. Dir. Records 1 $106,311
(52) Assoc. Dir. of Student Aid 1 $99,422
(53) Coord. of ASU Comm. Coll. Deg. Cntrs 1 $99,422
(54) Research Analyst 5 $99,378
(55) Assistant Director of Publications 1 $94,941
(56) Fiscal Support Pool 40
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(57) Public Safety Pool 29
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
03-31-2025 17:37:57 HAR035

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB130
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(58) Conservator 1 $87,933
(59) Technical Director 1 $87,933
(60) Academic Adviser 23 $86,780
(61) Assistant Director of Museum 1 $86,219
(62) Assistant Director of Computer Services 1 $83,416
(63) ASU Engineer Comm. Facilities Dir. 1 $83,416
(64) ASU Assoc. Dir. of Physical Plant 1 $81,860
(65) Benefits Coordinator 1 $78,713
(66) Curator 2 $78,713
(67) Procurement Coordinator 1 $78,713
(68) Education Program Coordinator 1 $78,712
(69) Grants Manager 2 $78,712
(70) ASU Asst. Dir. of Physical Plant 3 $75,685
(71) Skilled Trades Pool 89
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(72) Department Business Coordinator 3 $72,775
(73) Budget Specialist 2 $72,774
(74) Human Resources Analyst 4 $72,774
(75) Production Artist 2 $72,774
(76) ASU Asst. Director of Farming 1 $69,975
(77) ASU Dir. of Housekeeping 2 $69,975
(78) Buyer 1 $69,975
03-31-2025 17:37:57 HAR035

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB130
(79) Construction/Maint. Coordinator 2 $69,975
(80) HEI Program Coordinator 24 $69,975
(81) Museum Exhibit Program Specialist 1 $69,975
(82) Radio News Director 1 $69,975
(83) Radio Program Director 1 $69,975
(84) Administrative Support Pool 110
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(85) Assistant Registrar 6 $67,284
(86) Financial Aid Analyst 11 $67,284
(87) Library Support Pool 15
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(88) Fabrication Shop Manager 1 $67,284
(89) Payroll Services Specialist 2 $67,284
(90) Special Events Manager 2 $67,284
(91) Broadcast Production Specialist 4 $64,696
(92) Commercial Graphic Artist 3 $64,696
(93) Comm. Artist I/Graphic Artist I 2 $62,208
(94) Human Resources Specialist 2 $62,208
(95) Landscape Supervisor 2 $62,208
(96) Museum Registrar 1 $62,208
(97) Records Management Analyst 15 $62,208
(98) Maintenance Specialist 5 $59,815
(99) Purchasing Technician 1 $59,815
(100) Pest Control Tech 1 $57,515
(101) Landscape Specialist 2 $55,302
03-31-2025 17:37:57 HAR035

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB130
(102) Special Events Supervisor 1 $55,302
(103) Student Account Specialist 1 $55,302
(104) Admissions Analyst 2 $53,175
(105) Heavy Equipment Operator 7 $53,175
(106) Inventory Control Technician 3 $51,130
(107) Maintenance Assistant 4 $51,130
(108) Registrar's Assistant 2 $49,164
(109) Institutional Svcs. Supervisor 13 $43,706
(110) Institutional Svcs. Assistant 65 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(111) Nurse Anesthesia Clinical Coord. 3 $268,582
(112) Department Chairperson 30 $201,304
(113) Faculty 68
Professor $197,881
Assoc. Professor $184,186
Asst. Professor $156,658
Instructor $128,780
(114) Research Associate 4 $146,533
(115) Asst. Library Director 2 $112,217
(116) Librarian 10 $112,217
(117) Veterinary Medicine Instructor 3 $110,424
(118) Instructional Designer 10 $87,721
(119) Research Assistant 18 $87,721
(120) Graduate Assistant - Research 10 $64,109
(121) Graduate Assistant 130 $46,864
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(122) College of Business Faculty 40
Distinguished Professor $272,788
Professor $218,534
Associate Professor $179,510
Assistant Professor $171,705
Instructor $140,486
(123) Faculty 501
Distinguished Professor $221,655
03-31-2025 17:37:57 HAR035

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB130
Professor $194,459
Assoc. Professor $170,492
Asst. Professor $142,719
Instructor $111,361
Lecturer $89,979
(124) Part-Time Faculty 240 $56,046
(125) Graduate Assistant 150 $35,147
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(126) Vice Chancellor - Athletics 1 $681,971
(127) ASU Head Football Coach 1 $255,265
(128) Head Men's Basketball Coach 1 $255,265
(129) ASU Def. Coordinator-Football 1 $188,435
(130) ASU Off. Coordinator-Football 1 $188,435
(131) Assoc. Dir. of Athletics 4 $173,466
(132) ASU Asst. Head Football Coach 2 $166,458
(133) Assistant Football Coach 5 $166,458
(134) Head Coach 12 $146,047
(135) ASU Dir. of Auxiliary Enterprises 1 $140,296
(136) Dir. of Arena 1 $135,999
(137) Development/Advancement Admin. 3
Development/Advancement Director $135,747
Development/Advancement Manager $123,019
Development/Advancement Specialist $106,139
(138) Asst. Dir. Athletics 8 $130,431
(139) Head Athletic Trainer 1 $130,431
(140) Assistant Coach 25 $110,824
(141) Dir. of Strength & Conditioning 3 $110,824
(142) Trainer 5 $110,824
(143) Facilities and Equipment Manager 2 $99,798
(144) Assistant Director 1 $96,579
(145) Fiscal Support Pool 1
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
03-31-2025 17:37:57 HAR035

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB130
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(146) Asst. Dir. of Media Relations 2 $87,812
(147) Academic Adviser 2 $86,780
(148) Director of Marketing 1 $84,157
(149) Ticket Manager 1 $81,642
(150) Director of Student Union 1 $75,685
(151) Skilled Trades Pool 9
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(152) Athletic Ticket Sales Coordinator 1 $69,975
(153) Print Shop Manager 1 $69,975
(154) Administrative Support Pool 8
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(155) Special Events Manager 2 $67,284
(156) Institutional Printer 5 $64,696
(157) Student Union Night Manager 1 $64,696
(158) Special Events Coordinator 2 $59,815
(159) Athletic Facility Supervisor 3 $57,515
(160) Student Union Sec. Mgr. 1 $53,175
(161) Institutional Svcs. Supervisor 3 $43,706
(162) Institutional Svcs. Assistant 25 $42,025
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2,270
03-31-2025 17:37:57 HAR035

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB130

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Arkansas State University for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two thousand
sixty-four (2,064) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of
pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas State University, to be payable from the
Arkansas State University Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the Arkansas State University for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $57,500,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 134,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 9,150,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 7,203,094
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 570,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) FUNDED DEPRECIATION 1,000,000
(06) CONTINGENCY 3,465,103
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $79,022,197

SECTION 4. ALLOCATIONS. There is hereby allocated, to the various
programs of Arkansas State University, as set out herein, the following
amounts of the funds appropriated in the State Operations appropriation
section in this Act, to Arkansas State University, there to be used as

03-31-2025 17:37:57 HAR035

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB130
provided by law, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

MAXIMUM ALLOCATION
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(1) JONESBORO CAMPUS $72,767,154
(2) ASU - SYSTEM ADMINISTRATION 3,325,358
(3) HERITAGE SITES 2,476,122
(4) DELTA CENTER FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT 453,563
TOTAL AMOUNT ALLOCATED $79,022,197

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Arkansas State University, to be payable from cash funds as defined by
Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Arkansas State University for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $36,000,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 10,970,000
(03) OVERTIME 30,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 15,500,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 47,000,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 6,000,000
(C) PROF. FEES 27,675,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 11,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 51,396,158
(07) DEBT SERVICE 18,000,000
(08) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 200,000
(09) RESALE 125,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $223,896,158

SECTION 6. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
03-31-2025 17:37:57 HAR035

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB130
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 8. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee




03-31-2025 17:37:57 HAR035